District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.49

Voluntary dissolution — Plan of distribution.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 284, Pub. L. 87-569, § 49
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-268, § 2(a), 54 DCR 833
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 160(a)(1), 56 DCR 1117
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.49.
1981 Ed., § 29-550.
1973 Ed., § 29-1049.